Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.340

General contractor/construction manager procedure—Uses.

Subject to the process in RCW 39.10.270 or 39.10.280, public bodies may utilize the general contractor/construction manager procedure for public works projects where at least one of the following is met:

(1) Implementation of the project involves complex scheduling, phasing, or coordination;

(2) The project involves construction at an occupied facility which must continue to operate during construction;

(3) The involvement of the general contractor/construction manager during the design stage is critical to the success of the project;

(4) The project encompasses a complex or technical work environment;

(5) The project requires specialized work on a building that has historic significance; or

(6) The project is, and the public body elects to procure the project as, a heavy civil construction project. However, no provision of this chapter pertaining to a heavy civil construction project applies unless the public body expressly elects to procure the project as a heavy civil construction project.

[ 2014 c 42 s 3; 2013 c 222 s 12; 2007 c 494 s 301. Prior: 2003 c 352 s 3; 2003 c 300 s 5; 2002 c 46 s 2; 2001 c 328 s 3. Formerly RCW 39.10.061.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.

Effective date—2013 c 222: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Effective date—2002 c 46: See note following RCW 39.10.300.

Effective date—2001 c 328: See note following RCW 39.10.210.